District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1501

Appointment of conservators

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632

Cross References

Presumption of capacity, see § 21-2203.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1501 to 21-1507.